North Dakota, session 69, HB1188.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 15-20.2-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
15-20.2-08. Assessment of participating districts for proportionate share of center expenses
- Allocation of students - Civil penalty for failure to remit payment.
1. A center board shall, for the purpose of paying any administrative, planning, operating, or
capital expenses incurred or to be incurred, shall assess each participating:
a. Participating school district its proportionate sharea center membership fee based upon
its high school enrollment as compared to the total high school enrollment of all
participating school districts in the area career and technology center and shall assess
each nonparticipatingmay assess fees based on access and use of programs.
b. Nonparticipating school district receiving services its proportionate sharea fee based
upon its utilizationuse of programs.
2. A center board shall, as nearly as possible, allocate, as nearly as possible, the number of
students from each participating district to be served in an area career and technology center
on the same proportionate basis as is used for the assessment of expenses.
A center board utilizing mobile units solely shall, for the purpose of paying any administrative,
planning, operating, or capital expenses incurred or to be incurred, assess each participating school
district its proportionate share based upon its utilization of programs as compared to total program
utilization of all participating school districts in such center. A center board utilizing mobile units solely
shall, as nearly as possible, determine the program utilization of each participating school district to be
served based upon its high school enrollment as compared to the total high school enrollment of all
participating school districts in such center and the school's accessibility to those programs.
3. Each participating school district shall remit payment of the assessment of its share of
expenses to the center board promptly after receipt of the assessment notice, or within a
period of time determined by the center board, but no later than sixty days after the official
date of receipt as noted on the assessment notice. A civil penalty of one percent per month
must accrue on all assessments not paid when due.

H. B. NO. 1188 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1188.
House Vote: Yeas 88 Nays 0 Absent 6
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 0 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State